Illinois, session 104th, SB1852.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 3-7-2 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-7-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-7-2)7    Sec. 3-7-2. Facilities. 8    (a) All institutions and facilities of the Department 9shall provide every committed person with access to toilet 10facilities, barber facilities, bathing facilities at least 11once each week, a library of legal materials and published 12materials including newspapers and magazines approved by the 13Director. A committed person may not receive any materials 14that the Director deems pornographic.15    (b) (Blank).16    (c) All institutions and facilities of the Department 17shall provide facilities for every committed person to leave 18his cell for at least one hour each day unless the chief 19administrative officer determines that it would be harmful or 20dangerous to the security or safety of the institution or 21facility.22    (d) All institutions and facilities of the Department 23shall provide every committed person with a wholesome and   SB1852- 2 -LRB104 06496 RLC 20839 b1nutritional diet at regularly scheduled hours, drinking water, 2clothing adequate for the season, including underwear, 3bedding, soap, and towels, and medical and dental care. 4Underwear provided to each committed person in all 5institutions and facilities of the Department shall be free of 6charge and shall be provided at any time upon request, 7including multiple requests, of the committed person or as 8needed by the committed person.9    (e) All institutions and facilities of the Department 10shall permit every committed person to send and receive an 11unlimited number of uncensored letters, provided, however, 12that the Director may order that mail be inspected and read for 13reasons of the security, safety, or morale of the institution 14or facility.15    (e-1)(1) All institutions and facilities of the Department 16shall permit every committed person to receive the original, 17physical copy of any mail addressed to the committed person 18that the committed person is entitled and allowed to receive.19    (2) Any exceptions to the requirements of this subsection 20must be based on evidence that complying with the requirements 21of this subsection present a clear and present danger to the 22health and safety of the correctional employees or committed 23persons in the correctional institution or facility. The 24evidence must include evidence of contraband being sent 25through the mail, data on the number of mail items containing 26contraband, test results of mail tested due to suspicion of   SB1852- 3 -LRB104 06496 RLC 20839 b1mail containing drugs, data on where inside a correctional 2institution or facility contraband has been found, and the 3method of entry of contraband into the correctional 4institution or facility. The data and evidence must be made 5publicly available monthly on the Department's website but no 6later than 60 days after the use of the exception to the 7requirements of this subsection.8    (3) No committed person shall be denied, or have 9communications limited, with an outside support person, 10whether by phone, mail, video, or in person visitation, as a 11result of a change in the committed person's grade level or 12housing status or as a disciplinary sanction.13    (4) In this subsection (e-1), "original, physical copy" 14means a letter, card, or other document delivered to the 15correctional institution or facility by the United States 16Postal Service or other delivery service. "Original, physical 17copy" does not include mail that is scanned, photocopied, or 18otherwise duplicated by the correctional institution or 19facility or any entity contracted by the correctional 20institution or facility to provide such a service.21    (e-2) Committed persons may contact outside supports via 22phone, mail, or electronic message free of charge.23    (f) All of the institutions and facilities of the 24Department shall permit every committed person to receive 25in-person visitors and video contact, if available, except in 26case of abuse of the visiting privilege or when the chief   SB1852- 4 -LRB104 06496 RLC 20839 b1administrative officer determines that such visiting would be 2harmful or dangerous to the security, safety or morale of the 3institution or facility. Each committed person is entitled to 47 visits per month. Every committed person may submit a list of 5at least 30 persons to the Department that are authorized to 6visit the committed person. The list shall be kept in an 7electronic format by the Department beginning on August 1, 82019, as well as available in paper form for Department 9employees. The chief administrative officer shall have the 10right to restrict visitation to non-contact visits, video, or 11other forms of non-contact visits for reasons of safety, 12security, and order, including, but not limited to, 13restricting contact visits for committed persons engaged in 14gang activity. No committed person in a super maximum security 15facility or on disciplinary segregation is allowed contact 16visits. Any committed person found in possession of illegal 17drugs or who fails a drug test shall not be permitted contact 18visits for a period of at least 6 months. Any committed person 19involved in gang activities or found guilty of assault 20committed against a Department employee shall not be permitted 21contact visits for a period of at least 6 months. The 22Department shall offer every visitor appropriate written 23information concerning HIV and AIDS, including information 24concerning how to contact the Illinois Department of Public 25Health for counseling information. The Department shall 26develop the written materials in consultation with the   SB1852- 5 -LRB104 06496 RLC 20839 b1Department of Public Health. The Department shall ensure that 2all such information and materials are culturally sensitive 3and reflect cultural diversity as appropriate. Implementation 4of the changes made to this Section by Public Act 94-629 is 5subject to appropriation. The Department shall seek the lowest 6possible cost to provide video calling and shall charge to the 7extent of recovering any demonstrated costs of providing video 8calling. The Department shall not make a commission or profit 9from video calling services. Nothing in this Section shall be 10construed to permit video calling instead of in-person 11visitation. 12    (f-5) (Blank).13    (f-10) The Department may not restrict or limit in-person 14visits to committed persons due to the availability of 15interactive video conferences.16    (f-15)(1) The Department shall issue a standard written 17policy for each institution and facility of the Department 18that provides for:19        (A) the number of in-person visits each committed 20    person is entitled to per week and per month including the 21    requirements of subsection (f) of this Section;22        (B) the hours of in-person visits;23        (C) the type of identification required for visitors 24    at least 18 years of age; and25        (D) the type of identification, if any, required for 26    visitors under 18 years of age.   SB1852- 6 -LRB104 06496 RLC 20839 b1    (2) This policy shall be posted on the Department website 2and at each facility.3    (3) The Department shall post on its website daily any 4restrictions or denials of visitation for that day and the 5succeeding 5 calendar days, including those based on a 6lockdown of the facility, to inform family members and other 7visitors. 8    (g) All institutions and facilities of the Department 9shall permit religious ministrations and sacraments to be 10available to every committed person, but attendance at 11religious services shall not be required. This subsection (g) 12is subject to the provisions of the Faith Behind Bars Act.13    (h) Within 90 days after December 31, 1996, the Department 14shall prohibit the use of curtains, cell-coverings, or any 15other matter or object that obstructs or otherwise impairs the 16line of vision into a committed person's cell.17    (i) A point of contact person appointed under subsection 18(u-6) of Section 3-2-2 of this Code shall promptly and 19efficiently review suggestions, complaints, and other requests 20made by visitors to institutions and facilities of the 21Department and by other members of the public. Based on the 22nature of the submission, the point of contact person shall 23communicate with the appropriate division of the Department, 24disseminate the concern or complaint, and act as liaison 25between the parties to reach a resolution.26        (1) The point of contact person shall maintain   SB1852- 7 -LRB104 06496 RLC 20839 b1    information about the subject matter of each 2    correspondence, including, but not limited to, information 3    about the following subjects:4            (A) the parties making the submission;5            (B) any commissary-related concerns;6            (C) any concerns about the institution or 7        facility's COVID-19 COVID protocols and mitigations;8            (D) any concerns about mail, video, or electronic 9        messages or other communications with incarcerated 10        persons;11            (E) any concerns about the institution or 12        facility;13            (F) any discipline-related concerns;14            (G) any concerns about earned sentencing credits;15            (H) any concerns about educational opportunities 16        for incarcerated persons;17            (I) any concerns about health-related matters;18            (J) any mental health concerns;19            (K) any concerns about personal property;20            (L) any concerns about the records of the 21        incarcerated person;22            (M) any concerns about recreational opportunities 23        for incarcerated persons;24            (N) any staffing-related concerns;25            (O) any concerns about the transfer of individuals 26        in custody;  SB1852- 8 -LRB104 06496 RLC 20839 b1            (P) any concerns about visitation; and2            (Q) any concerns about work opportunities for 3        incarcerated persons.4        The information shall be maintained in accordance with 5    standards set by the Department of Corrections, and shall 6    be made available to the Department's Planning and 7    Research Division. The point of contact person shall 8    provide a summary of the results of the review, including 9    any resolution or recommendations made as a result of 10    correspondence with the Planning and Research Division of 11    the Department.12        (2) The Department shall provide an annual written 13    report to the General Assembly and the Governor, with the 14    first report due no later than January 1, 2023, and 15    publish the report on its website within 48 hours after 16    the report is transmitted to the Governor and the General 17    Assembly. The report shall include a summary of activities 18    undertaken and completed as a result of submissions to the 19    point of contact person. The Department of Corrections 20    shall collect and report the following aggregated and 21    disaggregated data for each institution and facility and 22    describe:23            (A) the work of the point of contact person;24            (B) the general nature of suggestions, complaints, 25        and other requests submitted to the point of contact 26        person;  SB1852- 9 -LRB104 06496 RLC 20839 b1            (C) the volume of emails, calls, letters, and 2        other correspondence received by the point of contact 3        person;4            (D) the resolutions reached or recommendations 5        made as a result of the point of contact person's 6        review;7            (E) whether, if an investigation is recommended, a 8        report of the complaint was forwarded to the Chief 9        Inspector of the Department or other Department 10        employee, and the resolution of the complaint, and if 11        the investigation has not concluded, a detailed status 12        report on the complaint; and13            (F) any recommendations that the point of contact 14        person has relating to systemic issues in the 15        Department of Corrections, and any other matters for 16        consideration by the General Assembly and the 17        Governor.18        The name, address, or other personally identifiable 19    information of a person who files a complaint, suggestion, 20    or other request with the point of contact person, and 21    confidential records shall be redacted from the annual 22    report and are not subject to disclosure under the Freedom 23    of Information Act. The Department shall disclose the 24    records only if required by a court order on a showing of 25    good cause.26        (3) The Department must post in a conspicuous place in   SB1852- 10 -LRB104 06496 RLC 20839 b1    the waiting area of every facility or institution a sign 2    that contains in bold, black type the following:3            (A) a short statement notifying visitors of the 4        point of contact person and that person's duty to 5        receive suggestions, complaints, or other requests; 6        and7            (B) information on how to submit suggestions, 8        complaints, or other requests to the point of contact 9        person. 10    (j) Menstrual hygiene products shall be available, as 11needed, free of charge, at all institutions and facilities of 12the Department for all committed persons who menstruate. In 13this subsection (j), "menstrual hygiene products" means 14tampons and sanitary napkins for use in connection with the 15menstrual cycle. 16(Source: P.A. 102-1082, eff. 6-10-22; 102-1111, eff. 6-1-23; 17103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-331, eff. 1-1-24; revised 7-22-24.)